Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2431
Power projects; certificate of approval; where filed; effect.

Upon final approval the Nebraska Power Review Board shall immediately cause one copy of the certificate to be forwarded to and filed in the office of the Secretary of State and the other one to be forwarded to and filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the principal place of business of the agency is located. Thereupon such agency under its designated name shall be and constitute a body politic and corporate, and the agency and its directors shall possess the powers provided by law.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 31;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 60.